Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202638-2071
Internationally trained physician; provisional or transitional license; disciplinary action; appeal.

An internationally trained physician aggrieved by any action against such physician's provisional or transitional license may appeal the decision. The appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 2026, LB1212, § 9.
August 1, 2027
Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.